Arkansas, session 2025, SB57.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-6-222(b) that resulted from Initiated Act
1 of 1996, concerning the income tax credit for certain individual political
contributions, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The credit allowed by subsection (a) of this section shall be the
aggregate contributions, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) one hundred
dollars ($100), on an individual tax return, or the aggregate contributions,
not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) two hundred dollars ($200), on a
joint return.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.


*JLL035*
01/13/2025 4:50:41 PM JLL035